Florida, session 2026, SB140.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âSection 626.9898, Florida Statutes, is created 15 to read: 16 626.9898âWhistleblower protections for employees and 17 contractors of property insurers.â 18 (1)âNotwithstanding s. 448.102, a property insurer, or any 19 of its agents or affiliates, may not discharge, suspend, demote, 20 threaten, harass, or take any other adverse action against an 21 employee or independent contractor because the employee or 22 independent contractor has, in good faith, disclosed to any 23 governmental agency or the news media an activity, a policy, or 24 a practice of the insurer or its agents or affiliates which is 25 in violation of law, constitutes unethical conduct, or involves 26 fraudulent insurance practices. 27 (2)âAn employee or independent contractor aggrieved by a 28 violation of this section may bring a civil action in a court of 29 competent jurisdiction within 2 years after discovering that the 30 alleged violation occurred or within 4 years after the adverse 31 action was taken, whichever is earlier. Such court may order the 32 relief authorized in s. 448.103(2). 33 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.